Idaho, session 2026, H0518.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-8605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8605. AUTHORITY OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. (1) The attorney general
shall employ such attorneys, investigators, and other personnel as neces-
sary to carry out the following responsibilities using funds allocated to
the office of the attorney general for such purpose:
(1) (a) To issue, by January 1 of each even-numbered year, a report
outlining the status of the state's efforts to combat human trafficking
and recommending next steps one (1) or more bodies of state government
should take to eradicate human trafficking in Idaho;
(2) (b) To compile and maintain curriculum for the training of prosecu-
tors, law enforcement, victim advocates, and the public on identifying,
investigating, and prosecuting human trafficking; and
(3) (c) To assist, upon request, county prosecuting attorneys and other
law enforcement agencies in the investigation and prosecution of human
trafficking.
(2) Any state or local law enforcement agency may submit the findings
of a human trafficking investigation to the attorney general, who shall have
authority, in his sole discretion, to investigate and prosecute human traf-
ficking under this act.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.